Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 1

Board of Examiners in Psychology

63-11-101. Board creation — Composition — Immunity from civil action.

There is created a board of examiners in psychology, referred to as the “board” in this chapter, to consist of ten (10) members who shall be appointed by the governor under conditions set forth in this chapter.

Two (2) members shall be chosen from and shall be members of the faculty, with the rank of assistant professor or above, of the accredited colleges and universities in the state and shall be engaged in teaching, research and/or administration of psychology.

Four (4) members shall be licensed psychologists.

Two (2) members shall be either a licensed psychological examiner or a licensed senior psychological examiner.

One (1) member shall be a private citizen who is neither a licensed psychologist nor a licensed psychological examiner or licensed senior psychological examiner and who has no professional or commercial interest in the practice of psychology.

Beginning July 1, 2014, the chair of the applied behavior analyst licensing committee of the board of examiners in psychology shall serve as an ex officio voting member of the board.

The board shall perform such duties and exercise such powers as this chapter prescribes and confers upon it.

No member of the board shall be liable to civil action for any act performed in good faith in the performance of its duties as set forth in this chapter.

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 4 (Williams, § 7082.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1101; Acts 1992, ch. 986, §§ 3, 7; 1993, ch. 102, § 1; 2000, ch. 926, §§ 3, 4; 2001, ch. 123, § 1; 2014, ch. 918, §§ 3, 4.

Compiler's Notes. The regulatory board created by this section is attached to the division of health related boards in the department of health. See §§ 63-1-132, 63-1-133, 68-1-101.

The board of examiners in psychology, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-242.

Cross-References. Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

Law Reviews.

Report on Administrative Law to the Tennessee Law Revision Commission, 20 Vand. L. Rev. 777.

63-11-102. Appointment and terms of members — Removal.

Original appointments to the board are for terms as follows: One (1) practicing psychologist for a term of one (1) year, one (1) academic psychologist for a term of two (2) years, one (1) practicing psychologist for a term of three (3) years, one (1) academic psychologist for a term of four (4) years and one (1) practicing psychologist for a term of five (5) years. The original appointments to the board for the licensed psychological examiner member and citizen member shall be four (4) and five (5) years, respectively. All subsequent appointments shall be for terms of five (5) years.

Vacancies shall be filled for any unexpired terms, and members shall serve until their successors are appointed and have qualified. Only practicing psychologists shall be appointed to succeed practicing psychologists, and only academic psychologists shall be appointed to succeed academic psychologists. Board members shall be ineligible for reappointments for a period of five (5) years following completion of their terms.

Appointments to the board for the psychologist members may be made from lists of qualified candidates to be furnished to the governor by interested psychology groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Psychological Association. Each list shall contain the names of academic psychologists and practicing psychologists. Appointments to the board for the psychological examiner and senior psychological examiner members may be made from lists of qualified candidates to be submitted to the governor from interested psychological examiner groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Psychological Association Division of Psychological Examiners. Each list shall contain the names of psychological examiners and senior psychological examiners. All vacancies occurring in the board may be filled by the governor for the unexpired term from the lists of qualified candidates within thirty (30) days after the vacancy occurs. The governor shall consult with such interested groups to determine qualified persons to fill positions on the board.

In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the board is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the board is a member of a racial minority.

Any board members may be removed by the governor after notice and hearing for incompetence, neglect of duty, malfeasance in office or moral turpitude.

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 5 (Williams, § 7082.5); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1102; Acts 1988, ch. 1013, § 49; 1992, ch. 986, §§ 4, 5, 8, 9; 2001, ch. 123, § 2; 2012, ch. 629, § 1.

63-11-103. Members' oath — Reports and records.

Immediately and before entering upon the duties of the office, the members of the board shall take the constitutional oath of office and shall file the same in the office of the governor who, upon receiving the oath of office, shall issue to each member a certificate of appointment.

The board shall have available for the governor or the governor's representative detailed reports on proceedings, and shall keep adequate records of all licenses and certificates and shall make an annual report in such form as required by the governor.

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 6 (Williams, § 7082.6); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1103; Acts 2001, ch. 123, § 3.

63-11-104. Organization — Meetings — Expenses — Powers.

The board shall elect annually a chair and vice chair.

Each member shall receive all necessary expenses incident to conducting the business of the board and, in addition thereto, shall be entitled to a per diem of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day's service in conducting the business of the board. All reimbursements for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The board shall hold at least one (1) regular meeting each year, the required meeting to be held at the state capitol. Called meetings may be held at the discretion of the chair or at the written request of any two (2) members of the board.

The board shall adopt a seal, which must be affixed to all certificates issued by the board.

The board shall, periodically, adopt such rules and regulations as it may deem necessary for the performance of its duties and shall examine and pass upon the qualifications of the applicants for the practice of psychology as provided in this chapter.

Six (6) members of the board at all times constitute a quorum.

Any action taken by the board shall require the approval of six (6) of its members.

The board shall be empowered to hire such assistance as is necessary to carry on its activities, within the limits of funds available to the board, and shall be empowered to accept grants from foundations or institutions to develop tests and carry on its functions.

The board shall receive administrative support from the division of health related boards in the department of health, referred to as the “division” in this chapter.

The board shall establish continuing educational requirements for psychologists designated as health service providers and psychological examiners, senior psychological examiners and certified psychological assistants.

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 7 (Williams, § 7082.7); 1976, ch. 517, § 3; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(101); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1104; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 43; 1992, ch. 986, §§ 6, 10; 1994, ch. 780, § 1; 1995, ch. 167, § 1; 2000, ch. 926, § 5; 2001, ch. 334, § 12; 2014, ch. 918, § 5.